Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-2012
Public Counsel; conclusions; report; inclusions.

The Public Counsel may report conclusions and suggestions by transmitting them to the Governor, the Legislature or any of its committees, the press, and others who may be concerned. When publishing an opinion adverse to an administrative agency, the Public Counsel shall include any statement the administrative agency may have made to the Public Counsel by way of explaining its past difficulties or its present rejection of the Public Counsel's proposals.

Laws 1969, c. 762, § 11, p. 2883;

Laws 2020, LB1144, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 81-8,250;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 12.